Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 4.1 Importation of Equines

4-4.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

“CEM” means contagious equine metritis.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Department” means the department of environmental management.

“Equine” means horses, including ponies, mules and donkeys.

“State veterinarian” means a veterinarian employed or designated by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 464, § 1.

4-4.1-2.
Quarantine procedure.

Any person who wishes to establish a quarantine facility in this state for any equine imported from a CEM affected country shall have the proposed facility inspected and approved by the department.

A representative of the department shall, upon request, make an initial visit to the proposed facility and make recommendations for any changes required. The owner or manager shall then submit a drawing of the farm as well as a detailed to scale drawing of all buildings, paddocks, pastures, and tracks intended for quarantine use. Upon receipt of these drawings the state veterinarian shall make an inspection and, if notified the facility is adequate, approve its use as a quarantine facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 464, § 1.

4-4.1-3.
Regulations.

The director may adopt regulations to carry out the intent of this chapter, which may include, without limitation, provisions relating to quarantine facilities, staff and procedures, laboratory and testing procedures, and the handling of equines, equipment and waste material handling.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 464, § 1.

4-4.1-4.
Fees.

The director may, by regulation, provide for the payment of fees to reimburse the state for the hourly expense of the state veterinarian or agent and his or her travel and administrative expense, incurred in carrying out the responsibilities provided for by the chapter and any applicable federal law or regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 464, § 1.

4-4.1-5.
Violations — Penalties.

Any person found guilty of violating any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted hereunder shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and may be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 464, § 1.